Virginia statutes. Title 24.2. Elections.
Article 5. Officers of Election.

§ 24.2-115.
Appointment, qualifications, and terms of officers of election.

Each electoral board at its regular meeting in the first week of February of the year in which the terms of officers of election are scheduled to expire shall appoint officers of election. Their terms of office shall begin on March 1 following their appointment and continue, at the discretion of the electoral board, for a term not to exceed three years or until their successors are appointed. The general registrar shall prepare and submit to the electoral board a plan to ensure that adequate numbers of trained officers of election are available to serve in each election.

Not less than three competent citizens shall be appointed for each precinct. However, a precinct having more than 4,000 registered voters shall have not less than five officers of election serving for a presidential election, and the electoral board shall appoint additional officers as needed to satisfy this requirement. Insofar as practicable, each officer shall be a qualified voter of the precinct he is appointed to serve, but in any case a qualified voter of the Commonwealth. In appointing the officers of election, representation shall be given to each of the two political parties having the highest and next highest number of votes in the Commonwealth for Governor at the last preceding gubernatorial election. The representation of the two parties shall be equal at each precinct having an even number of officers and shall vary by no more than one at each precinct having an odd number of officers. If practicable, officers shall be appointed from lists of nominations filed by the political parties entitled to appointments. The party shall file its nominations with the secretary of the electoral board at least 10 days before February 1 each year. The electoral board may appoint additional citizens who do not represent any political party to serve as officers. If practicable, no more than one-third of the total number of officers appointed for each precinct may be citizens who do not represent any political party.

Officers of election shall serve for all elections held in their respective precincts during their terms of office unless a substitute is required to be appointed pursuant to §

24.2-117

or the electoral board decides that fewer officers are needed for a particular election, in which case party representation shall be maintained as provided above. For a primary election involving only one political party, persons representing the political party holding the primary shall serve as the officers of election if possible.

The electoral board shall ensure that one officer is designated as the chief officer of election and one officer is designated as the assistant for each precinct. The officer designated as the assistant for a precinct, whenever practicable, shall not represent the same political party as the chief officer for the precinct. Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, where representatives for one or both of the two political parties having the largest number of votes for Governor in the last preceding gubernatorial election are unavailable, citizens who do not represent either of those two political parties may be designated as the chief officer and the assistant chief officer. In such case, the general registrar shall provide notice to representatives of both parties at least 10 days prior to the election that he intends to use nonaffiliated officers so that each party shall have the opportunity to provide additional nominations. The electoral board may also appoint at least one officer of election who reports to the precinct at least one hour prior to the closing of the precinct and whose primary responsibility is to assist with closing the precinct and reporting the results of the votes at the precinct.

The electoral board shall ensure that each chief officer and assistant is instructed in his duties not less than three nor more than 30 days before each election. Each officer of election may be instructed in his duties at an appropriate time or times before each November general election, and training of the officers of election shall be conducted as provided by §

24.2-115.2

.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

24.2-117

, if an officer of election is unable to serve at any election during his term of office, the electoral board may at any time appoint a substitute who shall hold office and serve for the unexpired term.

Additional officers shall be appointed in accordance with this section at any time that the electoral board determines that they are needed or as required by law.

If practicable, substitute officers or additional officers appointed after the electoral board’s regular meeting in the first week of February shall be appointed from lists of nominations filed by the political parties entitled to appointments. The electoral board or the general registrar shall inform the political parties of the decision of the electoral board to make such appointments and the party shall file its nominations with the secretary of the electoral board or the general registrar within five business days.

The secretary of the electoral board or general registrar shall prepare a list of the officers of election that shall be available for inspection and posted in the general registrar’s office prior to March 1 each year. Whenever substitute or additional officers are appointed, the secretary of the electoral board or the general registrar shall promptly add the names of the appointees to the public list. Upon request and at a reasonable charge not to exceed the actual cost incurred, the secretary of the electoral board or the general registrar shall provide a copy of the list of the officers of election, including their party designation and precinct to which they are assigned, to any requesting political party or candidate.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 24-30, 24-193, 24-195, 24-199; 1950, p. 164; 1970, c. 462, §§ 24.1-32, 24.1-105, 24.1-106; 1972, c. 620; 1975, c. 515; 1976, c. 616; 1978, cc. 330, 778; 1980, c. 639; 1982, c. 650; 1984, c. 480; 1986, c. 558; 1989, c. 227; 1993, c. 641; 1997, c. 459; 1998, c. 187; 2002, cc. 66, 216; 2003, cc. 232, 1015; 2005, c. 820; 2009, cc. 639, 865, 870, 874; 2010, cc. 190, 347, 769; 2013, c. 461; 2014, cc. 410, 777; 2015, c. 667; 2016, cc. 18, 492, 752, 766.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendments by cc. 66 and 216 are identical, and substituted “at an appropriate time or times” for “not less than three nor more than thirty days” in the fifth paragraph.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 232 in the second paragraph, substituted “Commonwealth” for “city or county” in the first sentence, and substituted “10” for “ten” in the last sentence; and substituted “30” for “thirty” in the fifth paragraph.

The 2003 amendment by c. 1015, rewrote the section.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 820, in the first paragraph, in the last sentence, inserted “at the discretion of the electoral board,” and substituted “a term not to exceed three years” for “one year.”

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 639 added the last sentence in the second paragraph.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 865, 870 and 874 are identical, and in the fourth paragraph, added the present last sentence; and in the seventh paragraph, substituted “shall be” for “may be.”

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 190, in the second paragraph, substituted “practicable” for “possible” in the fourth sentence and added the last sentence; and added the eighth paragraph.

The 2010 amendment by c. 347 added the last sentence in the last paragraph.

The 2010 amendment by c. 769, in the fifth paragraph, added “and shall conduct training of the officers of election consistent with the standards set by the State Board pursuant to subsection B of §

24.2-103

” in the first sentence, and added the last sentence.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 461 inserted “of the year in which the terms of officers of election are scheduled to expire” in the first sentence in the first paragraph.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 410, in the third paragraph, inserted “a substitute is required to be appointed pursuant to §

24.2-117

or” in the first sentence; and in the sixth paragraph inserted “Notwithstanding the provisions of §

24.2-117

” at the beginning.

The 2014 amendment by c. 777, in the second paragraph, substituted “even” for “equal” in the third sentence and deleted “but not as the chief officer or the assistant chief officer” at the end of the sixth sentence; and in the fourth paragraph added the third and fourth sentences.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 667, in the second paragraph, divided the former first sentence into the present first and third sentences by substituting a period for “and,” following “appointed for each precinct” and added the second sentence; and added “or as required by law” at the end of the seventh paragraph.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 18 and 492 are identical, and inserted the last sentence in the first paragraph; in the fourth paragraph, substituted “ensure that one officer is designated” for “designate one officer,” inserted “is designated,” substituted “citizens who do not represent either of those two political parties may be designated” for “the electoral board may designate,” deleted “citizens who do not represent any political party” at the end of the third sentence and substituted “general registrar” for “electoral board”; rewrote the fifth paragraph; inserted “or the general registrar” twice and substituted “the decision of the electoral board” for “its decision” in the next-to-last paragraph; and inserted “of the electoral board or the general registrar” twice in the last paragraph.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 752 and 766 are identical, and substituted “as provided by §

24.2-115.2

”
for “consistent with the standards set by the State Board pursuant to subsection B of §

24.2-103

. Each electoral board shall certify to the State Board that such training has been conducted every four years” at the end of the fifth paragraph.

The fifth paragraph is set out in the form above at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

Law Review.

For annual survey article, “Election Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 403 (2009).

For annual survey article, “Election Law and Government,” see 46 U. Rich. L. Rev. 119 (2011).

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 2-1301. Juror Qualification Form.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

6B M.J. Elections, §§ 8, 9.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Officers of election. —

A local electoral board, where it is feasible to do so, is required to appoint officers of election who represent the two dominant political parties. When it is not feasible to appoint representatives of such parties, a board may appoint nonpartisan officers. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Jean R. Jensen, Secretary, State Board of Elections, 06-058 (9/15/06).

§ 24.2-115.1.
Officers of election; hours of service.

The electoral board or general registrar may provide that the officers of election for one or more precincts may be assigned to work all or a portion of the time that the precinct is open on election day or reassigned to another precinct for the remaining portion of election day, as needed. Any officer of election assisting with the closing of the precinct and reporting the results of the votes at the precinct shall be required to report to the precinct at least one hour prior to the closing of the precinct. However, the chief officer and the assistant chief officer, appointed pursuant to §

24.2-115

to represent the two political parties, shall be on duty at all times. The electoral board or general registrar may provide for the administration of the oath of office provided for in §

24.2-120

and the oath required in §

24.2-611

to be kept with the pollbook at times convenient for officers of election assigned to work only a portion of the time that the precinct is open on election day.

History.

1998, cc. 549, 572; 2001, c. 623; 2009, cc. 396, 865, 870, 874; 2013, cc. 444, 462; 2016, cc. 18, 492.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 623 deleted the former second paragraph, which read: “This section shall expire on July 1, 2001.”

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by c. 396 added the last sentence.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 865, 870 and 874 are identical, and inserted the second sentence.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 444 and 462 are identical, and added “or reassigned to another precinct for the remaining portion of election day, as needed” at the end of the first sentence.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 18 and 492 are identical, and inserted “or general registrar” following “electoral board” in the first and last sentences.

§ 24.2-115.2.
Officers of election; required training.

Each officer of election shall receive training consistent with the standards set by the State Board pursuant to §

24.2-103

. This training shall be conducted by the electoral boards and general registrars, using the standardized training programs and materials developed by the State Board for this purpose. However, any electoral board and general registrar may instead require that the officers of election complete the online training course provided by the State Board pursuant to subsection D of §

24.2-103

. Each officer of election shall receive such training, or complete the online training course, before the first election in which he will be serving as an officer of election. Such requirement shall apply to each term for which the officer of election is appointed.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection A, each officer of election shall receive additional training or instruction whenever a change to election procedures is made to this title or to regulations that alters the duties or conduct of the officers of election. Such changes shall include changes to voting systems, electronic pollbook equipment or programming, voter identification requirements, and provisional ballot requirements. Such additional training shall be conducted or instruction given to all relevant individuals promptly after the law or regulation has taken effect, but not less than three days prior to the first election occurring in the locality after the law or regulation has taken effect.

Following any training conducted pursuant to this section, the electoral boards shall certify to the State Board that the officers of election in its jurisdiction have received the required training. Such certification shall include the dates of each completed training.

History.

2016, cc. 752, 766; 2020, cc. 286, 1148.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 286, in the third sentence in subsection B, inserted “to all relevant individuals,” substituted “first election” for “November general election” and inserted “occurring in the locality after the law or regulation has taken effect.”

The 2020 amendment by c. 1148 substituted “subsection D” for “subsection B” in subsection A.

§ 24.2-116.
Compensation of officers; volunteer officers.

The governing body of each county, city, or town shall pay its officers of election at least $75 for each full day’s service rendered on each election day. In addition, the governing body shall pay each officer $10 and mileage at the rate payable to members of the General Assembly for each time he delivers pollbooks and ballots to the polling place and each time he delivers returns and ballots to the appropriate official after the polls close. Jurisdictions may increase the salary of the officers collecting and delivering materials by at least $10 and the equivalent of mileage expenses from the furthest polling place in the locality in lieu of calculating the mileage and extra pay required by this section.

An officer of election may waive compensation and serve as an unpaid volunteer officer. Unpaid volunteer officers shall possess the qualifications and fulfill the requirements that apply to paid officers of election.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 24-207 through 24-209; 1950, p. 245; 1956, c. 235; 1968, c. 141; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-107; 1972, c. 620; 1974, c. 428; 1993, c. 641; 2003, c. 1015; 2012, c. 489.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 1015, substituted “$75 for each full day’s” for “thirty dollars for each day’s” in the first sentence, substituted “$10” for “ten dollars” in the second sentence, and inserted the last sentence.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 489 added the last paragraph.

Law Review.

For annual survey of Virginia law article, “Election Law,” see 47 U. Rich. L. Rev. 181 (2012).

§ 24.2-117.
Request for removal of officer of election.

A candidate may require the removal of an officer of election for the election in which he is a candidate by a request in writing, filed at least seven days before the election with the electoral board appointing the officer, on the grounds that the officer is the spouse, parent, grandparent, sibling, child, or grandchild of an opposing candidate. A member of the electoral board may also request the removal of an officer of election whom he knows to be the spouse, parent, grandparent, sibling, child, or grandchild of a candidate in the election by a request in writing, filed at least seven days before the election with the electoral board. Upon receipt of a timely written request pursuant to this section, the electoral board shall ensure that a substitute is appointed to serve for that election.

History.

1982, c. 650, § 24.1-105.1; 1993, c. 641; 2014, c. 410; 2016, cc. 18, 492.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 410 added the second sentence.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 18 and 492 are identical, and rewrote the last sentence, which read “The electoral board may appoint a substitute who shall hold office and serve for that election.”

§ 24.2-118.
Appointments when officers fail to serve.

If an officer of election is absent or unable to serve and the polls have been open for one hour, the remaining officers of election shall appoint a substitute officer of election for the precinct.
The substitute officer shall possess the same qualifications and, after taking the requisite oath, have the same powers as officers appointed by an electoral board.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-197; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-108; 1993, c. 641.

§ 24.2-118.1.
Repealed by Acts 2020, c. 838, cl. 2.

Cross references.

For current provisions pertaining to prohibition on, and penalty for, discrimination in employment, see §

24.2-119.1

.

Editor’s note.

Former §

24.2-118.1

, pertaining to prohibition on and penalty for discrimination in employment, derived from Acts 2005, c. 790.